Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.690.030

True copies of contracts filed in office of superintendent—Publication.

True copies of all contracts made on behalf of this state pursuant to the Agreement as provided in RCW 28A.690.010 shall be kept on file in the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall publish all such contracts in convenient form.

[ 1990 c 33 s 547; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.93.030, 28.93.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.